Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-9]
Transmission
of unvoted ballots. (a)
No later than forty-five days before the election or, if the forty-fifth day
before the election is a weekend or holiday, no later than the business day
preceding the forty-fifth day, the election official in each jurisdiction
charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit a
ballot and balloting materials to all covered voters who by that date submit a
valid military-overseas ballot application.

(b) A covered voter who requests that a ballot and balloting materials be sent to the voter by
electronic transmission may choose facsimile transmission or electronic
mail delivery, or, if offered by the voter's jurisdiction, internet delivery.
The election official in each jurisdiction charged with distributing a ballot
and balloting materials shall transmit the ballot and balloting materials to
the voter using the means of transmission chosen by the voter.

(c) If a ballot application from a covered voter arrives after the jurisdiction begins transmitting
ballots and balloting materials to voters, the official charged with
distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit them to the voter
no later than two business days or as soon as allowable after the application
arrives. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next